Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Chapter 6 Penalties

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of provisions of Federal Aviation Act (49 U.S.C. Appx § 1472(i)-(l), (n) [ 49 U.S.C. § 46501 et seq.]) punishing air piracy and certain acts aboard aircraft in flight, or boarding aircraft, 109 ALR Fed 488.

§ 10-6-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 207, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 37, § 3, provided penalties for operating an air taxi service without certification and for operating an aerial hunting or prospecting without registration.

Laws 2005, ch. 207, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 10-6-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 48, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1951, ch. 142, § 6, provided the penalty for violating any provision of W.S.

10-2-201

through 10-2-204.

§ 10-6-103.
Operating aircraft while under influence of alcohol or drug; penalty.

No person may act as a crew member of a civil aircraft within eight (8) hours after the consumption of any alcoholic beverage, or while under the influence of any intoxicating liquor, or while using any drug that affects his faculties in any way contrary to safety.

Any person convicted of violating W.S. 10-6-103(a) shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00), by imprisonment not to exceed six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 11, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 10-13, 10-14; W.S. 1977, §§ 10-1-113, 10-1-114; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to reporting of accidents to commission, see §

10-3-301

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and application of state criminal statute prohibiting reckless operation of aircraft, 89 ALR3d 893.

§ 10-6-104.
Penalty for violation of W.S. 10-4-101 through 10-4-303.

A person who violates any provision of W.S.

10-4-101

through

10-4-303

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00), by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 106, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 4-108; C.S. 1945, § 33-208; W.S. 1957, § 10-34; W.S. 1977, § 10-3-108; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1.